Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-509.01
Restriction on political committee participation.

The Secretary of State shall not be a member or officer of a committee as defined in section 49-1413 other than a committee formed for his or her own candidacy.

Laws 2006, LB 940, § 4.